District of Columbia statutes.
2-1801.01

Purpose.

It is the purpose of the Council of the District of Columbia in the adoption of this chapter to provide for the imposition of alternative civil sanctions for infractions of laws and regulations amended by title IV [of D.C. Law 6-42], and to provide for a uniform and expeditious system of administrative adjudication with respect to the infractions.

Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 101, 32 DCR 4450

Establishment of District of Columbia Board of Appeals and Review: See Mayor’s Order 86-50, March 31, 1986.

Establishment of District of Columbia Board of Appeals and Review: See Mayor’s Order 96-27, March 5, 1996 ( 43 DCR 1367).

D.C. Board of Appeals and Review established: See Mayor’s Order 86-50, March 31, 1986.
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to DC Law 6-100, the “Litter Control Administration Act of 1985;” DC Law 6-42, the “Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs Civil Infractions Act of 1985;” DC Law 5-165, the “DC Air Pollution Control Act of 1984;” DC Law 13-172, the “Rodent Control Act of 2000;” and DC Law 6-126, the “Construction Codes Approval and Amendments Act of 1986”, see Mayor’s Order 2002-5, February 1, 2002 ( 49 DCR 911).
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 6-42, the “Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs Civil Infractions Act of 1985”, see Mayor’s Order 99-68, April 28, 1999 ( 46 DCR 4234).
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 6-42, see Mayor’s Order 86-38, March 4, 1986.
“Title IV,” referred to in this section, is title IV of D.C. Law 6-42.
1981 Ed., § 6-2701.
This section is referenced in § 1-303.23, § 1-1001.14, § 7-1007, § 7-1671.08, § 7-1706, § 7-1721.03, § 7-1721.07, § 7-2341.24, § 8-102.04, § 8-104.06, § 8-108.04, § 8-153.01, § 8-439, § 8-1060, § 8-1772.03, § 8-1825.09, § 28-4103, § 37-131.08, § 37-201.18a, § 42-1207, § 47-857.09a, § 47-859.04a, § 47-2829, § 47-2862, § 50-921.76, and § 50-1641.07a.